District of Columbia statutes.
47-2718

Public space permits.

(a)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall amend from time to time the schedule of fees to be charged by the District of Columbia for the issuance of public space permits for underground excavations, constructing manholes, and connecting sewers, conduits and mains. The Mayor shall amend the schedule by rule to provide for fees in amounts as in his judgment will defray the approximate costs of issuing permits and of performing inspections as may be necessary in connection therewith.

(b)

Until the schedule of fees is amended by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the schedule of fees to be charged by the District of Columbia for the issuance of public space permits for underground excavations, constructing manholes, and connecting sewers, conduits and mains is as follows:

Fuel oil, etc.
Fee

UNDERGROUND EXCAVATIONS

Fuel oil, gasoline and solvent fill pipes
$69.00

Fuel oil tanks with curb fills, or residential tanks with curb fills
276.00

Nonresidential tanks with curb fills
291.00

Replacement or repair of fill pipes and repair of tanks
69.00

Replacement of tanks
178.00

MANHOLES

(Except transformer), and valves. For 1 house connection and 1 associated necessary manhole when no other work is included in permit. For constructing a single manhole or gas valve without laying conduit or main. For rebuilding a manhole, including any change in the size, shape, depth, or location of conduit made necessary by the work on the manhole. If a manhole is reduced in size, the conduit may be extended to a new wall, or altered slightly in location or depth to conform to the new manhole location without additional charge
42.00.

SEWER CONNECTIONS

All sewer connections except those to trunk sewers, when part of another job
24.00.

Sewer connections to trunk sewers, when part of another job
69.00.

All sewer connections except those to trunk sewers, when not included with other work
39.00.

Sewer connections to trunk sewers, when not included with other work
85.00.

SEWER CONNECTIONS

All sewer connections except those to trunk sewers, when part of another job
24.00.

Sewer connections to trunk sewers, when part of another job
69.00.

All sewer connections except those to trunk sewers, when not included with other work
39.00.

Sewer connections to trunk sewers, when not included with other work
85.00.

CONDUIT OR MAIN

Conduit and manholes, or main and valves
85.00.

Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title VI, § 601, 23 DCR 2461
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 202(b), 30 DCR 2632
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mayor, Council and other officers, licensing and registration fees, Mayor’s power to fix, see § 1-301.74.
Mayor, Council and other officers, Mayor’s power to increase or decrease fees authorized in § 1-301.74, see § 1-301.75.
This section is referenced in § 1-301.74, § 47-4607, and § 47-4620.
1981 Ed., § 47-2718.
1973 Ed., § 47-2216.
Section 503 of D.C. Law 13-172 provided: “The amendments made by section 502 of this title to the public rights-of-way rental fees do not preclude the Mayor from further amending these same fees as authorized in section 604 of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Act of 1996 provided that the amended rates, when taken together with the other user fees, charges, and penalties collected pursuant to that section and D.C. Code § 47-2718 do not adversely impact the positive fiscal impact identified in section 506 of this title.”
Delegation of authority pursuant to An Act Making Appropriations to Provide for the Expenses of the Government of D.C. for the FY Ending June 30, 1920 and for Other Purposes; and to the License Fees and Charges Act of 1976, see Mayor’s Order 99-158, October 13, 1999 ( 46 DCR 8841).
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 1102 of D.C. Law 5-14 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules necessary to carry out the provisions of the act.